Oklahoma, session 2026, HB1628.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:
SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1151.2a, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1151.2a. A. The Construction Industries Board is
authorized to administer and enforce the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act.

B. 1. The Construction Industries Board is authorized to
administer and enforce the commercial roofer endorsement provisions
of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act.
2. The Construction Industries Board shall have the authority
to administer and enforce the provisions of the commercial roofer
endorsement provisions of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act,
including the authority to:
a. establish the examination and continuing education
requirements and procedures for endorsements of
persons desiring or intending to engage in the
business or trade of a commercial roofing contractor
with the advice and input from the Committee of
Roofing Examiners using assistance from a third-party
vendor as necessary and appropriate,
b. establish and enforce the minimum standards of
commercial roofer endorsements in this state and rules
promulgated pursuant to the commercial roofer
endorsement provisions of the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act with the advice and input from the
Committee of Roofing Examiners,
c. promulgate, prescribe, amend, and repeal rules
necessary to implement the provisions of the
commercial roofer endorsement of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act with the advice and input
from the Committee of Roofing Examiners,
d. issue, renew, suspend, revoke, modify, or deny
endorsements to engage in commercial roofing
contractor work pursuant to the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act,
e. conduct investigations for the purpose of inspecting
commercial roofer endorsements for compliance with the
commercial roofer endorsement provisions of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, and of the rules
of the Board promulgated pursuant thereto, into the
qualifications of applicants and allegations of
violations,
f. establish and levy administrative fines against any
person who violates any of the provisions of the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 2

commercial roofer endorsement standards of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act or any rule promulgated
pursuant thereto, not to exceed five percent (5%) of
the commercial job. For any residential job, on a
first violation, the Board may issue a warning levy an
administrative fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00); on any second violation, levy and an
administrative fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00) One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00); on a third
violation, levy an administrative fine not to exceed
Three Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00); and
for any subsequent violation, revoke the registration
and commercial roofer endorsement,
g. initiate disciplinary proceedings and provide hearings
on any person who violates any of the provisions of
the commercial roofer endorsement standards of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act or any rule
promulgated pursuant thereto,
h. request prosecution of and initiate injunctive
proceedings against any person who violates any of the
provisions of the commercial roofers endorsement in
the Roofing Contractor Registration Act or any rule
promulgated pursuant to the commercial roofer
endorsement of the Roofing Contractor Registration
Act, and
i. exercise all incidental powers as necessary and proper
to implement and enforce the provisions of the
commercial roofer endorsement of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act and the rules promulgated
pursuant thereto.
C. 1. The Construction Industries Board shall administer and
enforce the residential roofer endorsement provisions of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act.
2. The Construction Industries Board shall administer and
enforce the provisions of the residential roofer endorsement
provisions of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act, including:
a. establish the examination and continuing education
requirements and procedures for endorsements of
persons desiring or intending to engage in the
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 3

business or trade of a residential roofing contractor
with the advice and input from the Committee of
Roofing Examiners using assistance from a third-party
vendor as necessary and appropriate,
b. establish and enforce the minimum standards of
residential roofer endorsements in this state and
rules promulgated pursuant to the residential roofer
endorsement provisions of the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act with the advice and input from the
Committee of Roofing Examiners,
c. promulgate, prescribe, amend, and repeal rules
necessary to implement the provisions of the
residential roofer endorsement of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act with the advice and input
from the Committee of Roofing Examiners,
d. issue, renew, suspend, revoke, modify, or deny
endorsements to engage in residential roofing
contractor work pursuant to the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act,
e. conduct investigations for the purpose of inspecting
residential roofer endorsements for compliance with
the residential roofer endorsement provisions of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, and of the rules
of the Board promulgated pursuant thereto, into the
qualifications of applicants and allegations of
violations,
f. establish and levy administrative fines against any
person who violates any of the provisions of the
residential roofer endorsement standards of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act or any rule
promulgated pursuant thereto. For any residential
job, on a first violation, the Board may levy an
administrative fine not to exceed Five Hundred Dollars
($500.00); on any second violation, levy an
administrative fine not to exceed One Thousand Dollars
($1,000.00); on a third violation, levy an
administrative fine not to exceed Three Thousand Five
Hundred Dollars ($3,500.00); and for any subsequent
violation, revoke the registration and residential
roofer endorsement,
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 4

g. initiate disciplinary proceedings and provide hearings
on any person who violates any of the provisions of
the residential roofer endorsement standards of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act or any rule
promulgated pursuant thereto,
h. request prosecution of and initiate injunctive
proceedings against any person who violates any of the
provisions of the residential roofers endorsement in
the Roofing Contractor Registration Act or any rule
promulgated pursuant to the residential roofer
endorsement of the Roofing Contractor Registration
Act, and
i. exercise all incidental powers as necessary and proper
to implement and enforce the provisions of the
residential roofer endorsement of the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act and the rules promulgated
pursuant thereto.
SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1151.5, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1151.5. A. Applications for registration shall be made
to the Construction Industries Board in writing on forms approved
and provided by the Board and shall be accompanied by the proper
fee.
B. An applicant or qualifying party whose registration is
denied, or the person has a conviction, or pled guilty or nolo
contendere to a misdemeanor, or otherwise fails to meet the
requirements of application, may obtain a hearing before the
Committee of Roofing Examiners in order to provide information in
support of the application requirements and any other information
showing the applicant’s ability and willingness to comply with the
requirements of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act, and to
protect the public health, safety and welfare.
C. To obtain a roofing contractor registration under the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act, a qualifying party who is
eighteen (18) years of age or older shall submit, on forms the
registrar prescribes:
1. An application under oath containing a statement:
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 5

a. of the qualifying party’s experience and
qualifications as a roofing contractor, if any,
b. that the qualifying party desires the issuance of a
roofing contractor registration certificate,
c. that the qualifying party has read the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act and will comply with the
provisions of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act
and rules,
d. that the qualifying party will comply with state laws
and local ordinances relating to standards and
permits,
e. that the qualifying party has or has not been
registered or licensed as a roofing contractor in
another state and whether any disciplinary action has
been taken against such registration or license and
whether it is currently in good standing, and
f. that the nonresident qualifying party appoints the
Secretary of State as legal service agent for all
lawful process to be served upon the applicant for
work performed in this state or as otherwise provided
in the Roofing Contractor Registration Act;
2. The qualifying party’s name, physical address and proof
thereof, business name, telephone number, address and place of
incorporation, if different, information on any other person who
will be authorized to act as the business entity, and the
applicant’s phone telephone number, if different;
3. The entity’s federal tax ID number, or the employer’s or
owner’s or qualifying party’s social security Social Security
number, and the employer’s account number assigned by the Oklahoma
Employment Security Commission. The social security Social Security
number information shall remain with the registrar as confidential
and privileged except for necessary disclosures to state agencies to
verify compliance with requirements with this act, or upon request
by law enforcement; and
4. A copy of the roofing contractor’s certificate of liability
insurance shall be filed with the application and shall be not less
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 6

than Five Hundred Thousand Dollars ($500,000.00) for residential
roofing contractor work and shall not be less than One Million
Dollars ($1,000,000.00) for commercial roofing contractor work.
Additionally, the Construction Industries Board shall be listed as a
certificate holder. Any insurance company issuing a liability
policy to a roofing contractor pursuant to the provisions of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act shall be required to notify the
Construction Industries Board in the event such liability policy is
cancelled canceled for any reason or lapses for nonpayment of
premiums. All registrations granted under the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act shall be suspended on the date of the policy
cancellation. The registrar must receive proof of insurance prior
to restoring the registration.
In addition, the roofing contractor shall submit proof that the
contractor has secured workers’ compensation coverage satisfactory
under the Workers’ Compensation Act, or an affidavit of exemption or
self-insurance as authorized pursuant to the Workers’ Compensation
Act. If the registrar deems it appropriate or necessary, the
registrar may also require other information to be included on the
application form to assist the registrar in registering the person
as a contractor.
D. The qualifying party applying for a commercial roofer
endorsement must provide information on the legal entity, including,
but not limited to, the articles, organizational agreements or
documents establishing the legal entity, including a list of the
officers, members, managers, partners, or other managing agents of
the legal entity. The qualifying party shall also provide a
certificate of good standing or a trade name report from the Office
of the Secretary of State.
E. The registrar shall refuse to register any person if the
registrar determines:
1. The application contains false, misleading, or incomplete
information;
2. The applicant fails to provide a certificate of good
standing or a trade name report from the Office of the Secretary of
State;
3. The applicant, qualifying party, or any member of the legal
entity fails or refuses to provide any information requested by the
registrar;
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 7

4. The applicant fails or refuses to pay the required fees;
5. The applicant, qualifying party, or owner or officer or
managing member of the legal entity is ineligible for registration
due to a suspended or revoked registration in this state;
6. The nonresident applicant has a revoked or suspended
registration or license required by law for roofing contractors in
another state; or
7. The applicant, qualifying party, or legal entity has failed
or refuses to submit any taxes due in this state.
F. The registrar shall notify the applicant in writing if the
registrar denies a registration or renewal certificate, and shall
provide the applicant an opportunity to respond to or cure any
defect in the written application or renewal for a period of ten
(10) days from the date of the written notification. An applicant
aggrieved by a decision of the registrar denying a registration or
renewal may appeal the decision as provided in the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act, the Construction Industries Board Act,
or the Administrative Procedures Act, or the applicant may reapply
after a ninety-day waiting period, if otherwise eligible under the
provisions of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act. The
application and renewal fees shall not be refundable.
G. The registrar shall classify as not in good standing the
registration of any roofing contractor who fails to:
1. Maintain liability insurance coverage;
2. Maintain workers’ compensation coverage satisfactory under
the Workers’ Compensation Act, or provide an affidavit of exemption
or self-insurance as authorized pursuant to the Workers’
Compensation Act;
3. File, renew, or properly amend any fictitious name
certificate;
4. Maintain an active status of a corporation or registration
as a foreign corporation, a limited liability company or
registration as a foreign limited liability company, a limited
liability partnership registration or foreign limited liability
partnership registration, or a limited partnership certificate or
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 8

limited partnership or foreign limited partnership certificate of
authority, with the Office of the Secretary of State;
5. File or renew a trade name registration;
6. Maintain or renew a roofing contractor registration as
provided in the Roofing Contractor Registration Act;
7. Notify the registrar of a change in name, address, legal
business entity, qualifying party, legal service agent, or
adjudication by a court of competent jurisdiction for any act or
omission specified in subsection A of Section 1151.14 of this title
or a violation of the Roofing Contractor Registration Act;
8. Maintain a registration as required by law in another state
while registered in this state as a nonresident roofing contractor;
or
9. File and pay all taxes of the qualifying party and legal
entity when due in this state.
H. The registrar shall send a written notice to the qualifying
party when his or her registration is not in good standing.
I. Any roofing contractor who has been notified by the
registrar that his or her registration is not in good standing shall
cease soliciting or entering new roofing services and projects as of
the date of such notification; however, the roofing contractor shall
be allowed to complete roofing projects where actual physical work
has begun prior to the date of issuance of the notice that his or
her registration is not in good standing. The roofing contractor
must disclose the change in standing to any homeowner or other
person who has an interest in any job covered under the Roofing
Contractor Registration Act. Upon notice of a change in standing,
the homeowner shall have the option to cancel the contract. The
roofing contractor will be owed the actual cost incurred for
materials and the market value of labor already incurred on the job.
The roofing contractor must obtain an updated authorization from the
homeowner and other parties of interest if there is an agreement to
continue the job as originally negotiated. If the roofing
contractor fails to correct the deficiency specified in the notice
by evidence satisfactory to the registrar within thirty (30) days of
the date of the notice, or if the roofing contractor solicits or
enters into new roofing services contracts or projects while the
roofing contractor’s registration is not in good standing, or while
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 9

such registration is suspended or revoked, the roofing contractor
shall be in violation of the provisions of the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act.
J. Any registration that remains not in good standing for a
sixty-day period shall be suspended on the sixtieth day from the
date of issuance of the notice to the roofing contractor that his or
her registration is not in good standing. Any registration that
remains not in good standing, and is suspended for such cause, shall
be revoked on the ninetieth day from the date of issuance of the
notice to the roofing contractor that his or her registration is not
in good standing. The registrar shall notify the roofing contractor
upon suspension or revocation of his or her registration for failure
to comply in bringing such registration into good standing as
required by law. The roofing contractor may reinstate his or her
registration to good standing by paying the required fees provided
in Section 1151.12 of this title and complying with all other
requirements for issuance of a registration in good standing.
K. Any registrant, qualifying party, or roofing company owner
aggrieved by the decision of the registrar to suspend or revoke a
registration pursuant to this section may appeal such decision as
provided in this act or the Administrative Procedures Act.
SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 59 O.S. 2021, Section 1151.10, is
amended to read as follows:
Section 1151.10. A. Within twenty-five (25) calendar days from
the date of application, the registrar shall either issue or deny
the roofing contractor registration. No registration shall be
issued to a qualifying party until the registrar receives all
documentation and fees necessary to obtain a registration
certificate in good standing. The registration certificate issued
on an original application entitles the person to act as a roofing
contractor within this state, subject to the limitations of the
Roofing Contractor Registration Act. Until January 1, 2015, all
registrations shall expire on June 30 of each year and may be
renewed from year to year. Beginning no later than January 1, 2015,
all registrations issued shall be renewed based on staggered
expiration dates of the last day of the birth month of the
qualifying party so that all registrations and endorsements shall
expire on the last day in the birth month of the qualifying party.
The Construction Industries Board is authorized to prorate
registration and renewal fees, as described by rule, so that
beginning January 1, 2015, or thirty (30) days after rules have been
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 10

approved, fees for renewals previously due by June 30, 2015, are
prorated and converted to be due the last day of the birth month of
the qualifying party by shortening or lengthening the next renewal
date by up to six (6) months. Beginning the effective date of this
act November 1, 2014, new initial registrations and endorsements
will be issued for up to eighteen (18) months and due for renewal
the last day of the birth month of the qualifying party. After
initial proration or conversion to birth month, no subsequent
registration or endorsement shall be issued for longer than one (1)
year and all endorsements shall expire on the last day in the birth
month of the qualifying party. The Construction Industries Board
shall implement rules for the scheduling of expiration and renewal
of registrations and endorsements, including the prorating of fees
and the identification and information of the qualifying party. The
commercial or residential roofer endorsement shall expire on the
expiration date of the supporting registration.
B. An applicant or qualifying party whose registration or
endorsement is refused or denied by the registrar may obtain a
hearing before the Committee of Roofing Examiners with written
notice to the registrar of the grounds for appeal and identification
of evidence to be presented in support of the application
requirements and any other information showing the applicant’s
ability and willingness to comply with the requirements of the act,
and to protect the public health, safety and welfare. Such appeals
to the Committee of Roofing Examiners shall be made by the
qualifying party in writing to the registrar within fourteen (14)
days from the date of the written notification of denial or refusal
to register or endorse.
C. The Construction Industries Board shall issue a commercial
or residential roofer endorsement to any person who:
1. Has been certified by the Committee of Roofing Examiners as
having successfully passed the appropriate examination; and
2. Has paid the application and endorsement fee and has
otherwise complied with all of the provisions of the commercial or
residential roofer endorsement of the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act. The endorsement fee is hereby established as up
to Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00). Renewal of a commercial or
residential roofer endorsement shall be One Hundred Dollars
($100.00).
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 11

Endorsements renewed more than thirty (30) days following the
date of expiration may only be renewed upon application and payment
of the required fees and payment of late renewal fee in the amount
of One Hundred Dollars ($100.00).
No endorsement shall be renewed unless the licensee has
completed the required hours of continuing education recommended by
the Committee and set forth by rule.
No late fee shall be charged to renew a registration or
endorsement which expired while the applicant was in active military
service, if application for renewal is made within one (1) year of
discharge from active duty status.
SECTION 4. NEW LAW A new section of law to be codified
in the Oklahoma Statutes as Section 1151.25a of Title 59, unless
there is created a duplication in numbering, reads as follows:
A. Except as otherwise provided in the Roofing Contractor
Registration Act, on and after the effective date of this act, every
roofing contractor, except for those defined in subsection G of this
section, offering to engage in or engaging in performing residential
roofing contractor work in this state shall be required to receive a
residential roofing endorsement. To receive a residential roofing
endorsement, the roofing contractor shall be required to take and
successfully pass a residential roofing examination approved under
the provisions of this act with a minimum score of seventy percent
(70%), and be in compliance with all other provisions of this act
and rules before acting or being endorsed as a residential roofing
contractor. For applicants who have been registered and in good
standing with the Construction Industries Board on the effective
date of this act, there shall be a twelve-month grandfathering-in
period from the effective date of this act to either pass the exam
or complete an additional ten (10) hours of continuing education
credits approved in advance by the Committee of Roofing Examiners to
be granted a residential roofer endorsement. Any applicant who has
been registered, is in good standing with the Board, and possesses a
current commercial roofer endorsement on the effective date of this
act shall be exempt from the residential roofing examination and
additional ten (10) hours of continuing education credits required
to receive a residential roofing endorsement.
B. Examinations for a residential roofer endorsement shall be
uniform and practical in nature and sufficiently strict to test the
qualifications and fitness of the applicants for endorsement.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 12

Examinations shall be in whole or in part in writing. Examinations
shall be offered at least monthly; dates, times, and locations shall
be determined by the registrar or third-party vendor with approval
of the registrar.
C. Any applicant initially failing to pass the examination
shall not be permitted to take another examination for a period of
thirty (30) days. Any applicant subsequently failing to pass the
examination shall not be permitted to take another examination for a
period of ninety (90) days. However, in a declared state of
emergency, the examination shall be available as often as possible
as determined by the registrar.
D. No residential roofer endorsement shall be renewed unless
the qualifying party has completed the required hours of continuing
education pursuant to subsection A of this section.
E. For all new applicants not registered and in good standing
with the Construction Industries Board prior to the effective date
of this act, the Construction Industries Board shall issue a
residential roofer endorsement to qualifying applicants no sooner
than thirty (30) days from the date of successful completion of the
exam. New applicants shall not be allowed to sell, offer, bid,
inspect, or perform any residential roofing contractor work in this
state until a residential roofer endorsement is issued.
F. For all applicants registered and in good standing with the
Construction Industries Board prior to the effective date of this
act:
1. The residential roofer endorsement shall be issued
immediately upon compliance with the provisions of this section; and
2. Applicants shall be allowed to continue residential roofing
contractor work at all times during the residential roofer
endorsement application process.
G. The residential roofing endorsement shall not apply to
roofing labor contractors who:
1. Only provide roofing construction labor services;
2. Are working directly for a registered roofing contractor
that possesses a residential roofing endorsement; and
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 13

3. Are not providing any materials.
SECTION 5. This act shall become effective July 1, 2026.
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 14

Passed the House of Representatives the 21st day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the House
of Representatives
Passed the Senate the 7th day of May, 2025.
Presiding Officer of the Senate
OFFICE OF THE GOVERNOR
Received by the Office of the Governor this ____________________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
Approved by the Governor of the State of Oklahoma this _________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
_________________________________
Governor of the State of Oklahoma
OFFICE OF THE SECRETARY OF STATE
Received by the Office of the Secretary of State this __________
day of ___________________, 20_______, at _______ o'clock _______ M.
By: _________________________________
ENR. H. B. NO. 1628 Page 15